Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Nursing Education Programs.

Sec. 08.68.280.
Nursing education program prohibited unless approved.

A person, institution, or agency may not conduct a nursing education program that prepares persons for examination or licensing unless the program is approved by the board.
A program may be approved by the board only if it is established through an approved postsecondary educational institution.

History.

(§ 18 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 21 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 55 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For nursing education of registered and practical nurses, see 12 AAC 44, art. 1.

Sec. 08.68.290.
Application for accreditation.

An institution desiring to conduct a nursing education program to prepare registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurses shall apply to the board and submit evidence that it is prepared to

carry out the curriculum approved by the board for registered nursing, advanced practice registered nursing, or practical nursing; and

meet other standards established by law and by the board.

History.

(§ 17 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 22 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 15 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For nursing education of registered and practical nurses, see 12 AAC 44, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in the opening phrase, inserted “, advanced practice registered,” preceding “or practical”; in (1), inserted “, advanced practice registered nursing” following “registered nursing”.

Secs. 08.68.300 — 08.68.320.
Accreditation by board. [Repealed, § 29 ch 14 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 08.68.330.
List of approved programs.

The board shall prepare, maintain, and from time to time publish a list of approved nursing education programs in the state.

History.

(§ 19 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 13 ch 55 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing competency, see 12 AAC 44, art. 6.